Idaho, session 2025, H0151.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-9407, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 94, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-9407, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-9407. REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (1) For the purposes of this sec-
tion:
(a) "Agency" means a state agency that is subject to the provisions of
section 67-1904, Idaho Code, and that is a licensing authority as de-
fined in this chapter.
(b) "Credible complaint" means an allegation supported by specific
facts or evidence that reasonably warrants investigation of a potential
quality-related violation or technical violation.
(c) "Quality-related violation" means a disciplinary action that re-
lates to direct consumer harm such as an injury from a practice error or
negligence.
(d) "Technical violation" means a disciplinary action that relates to
the violation of a specific occupational licensing-related law or rule
that does not cause direct consumer harm, such as failing to meet a con-
tinuing education requirement, late renewal of a license, or failing to
hold certain required insurance.
(2) As part of the annual performance report that an agency is required
to prepare pursuant to section 67-1904, Idaho Code, an agency shall, begin-
ning with the fiscal year 2027 report, include the following information
separately for each license under its purview:
(a) The total number of licensees as of the last day of the fiscal year;
(b) The total number of new licenses issued during the fiscal year;
(c) The number of new applicants for licensure who were denied licen-
sure during the fiscal year;
(d) The number of licenses renewed during the fiscal year;
(e) The number of licenses that were not renewed during the fiscal year;
(f) The number of credible complaints against licensees during the fis-
cal year; and


(g) The number of final disciplinary actions against licensees during
the fiscal year.
(3) For disciplinary actions reported pursuant to subsection (2)(g) of
this section, an agency shall report:
(a) The number and type of disciplinary action taken, reported as a cor-
rective action plan, civil fine, license suspension, license revoca-
tion, or other;
(b) The number of related disciplinary actions stemming from technical
violations;
(c) The number of related disciplinary actions stemming from quality-
related violations; and
(d) For all quality-related violations, a brief, de-identified summary
of the violations suitable for the lay public to understand the nature
of the case.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.